Arkansas, session 2025, SB27.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES. There is hereby established for the
Department of Health - Arkansas Minority Health Commission for the 2025-2026
fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) N133N ADH DIRECTOR MINORITY HEALTH COMMISS 1 GRADE GS14
(2) L053C HEALTH PROGRAM SPECIALIST I 1 GRADE GS06
(3) P031C MEDIA SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 3

*MAH007*
01/06/2025 3:27:13 PM MAH007

SB27
SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Department of Health, to be payable from the Miscellaneous Agencies
Fund Account, for personal services and operating expenses of the Department
of Health - Arkansas Minority Health Commission for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $148,532
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 49,958
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 12,184
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 500
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) PROMOTIONAL ITEMS 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $211,174

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - CASH. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Health, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the State
Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal
services and operating expenses of the Department of Health - Arkansas
Minority Health Commission for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) PERSONAL SERVICES & OPERATING EXPENSES $25,949

SECTION 4. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
PROMOTIONAL ITEMS. The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall establish
upon request for the Minority Health Commission a special Promotional Items
appropriation to be used in the acquisition of promotional items. When the
Minority Health Commission wishes to transfer from its operating expenses
01/06/2025 3:27:13 PM MAH007

SB27
appropriation and funds to the promotional items line, the request shall be
forwarded by the Minority Health Commission to the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State for processing and for prior approval by the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee. Determining the maximum number of
employees and the maximum amount of appropriation and general revenue funding
for a state agency each fiscal year is the prerogative of the General
Assembly. This is usually accomplished by delineating such maximums in the
appropriation act(s) for a state agency and the general revenue allocations
authorized for each fund and fund account by amendment to the Revenue
Stabilization law. Further, the General Assembly has determined that the
Minority Health Commission may operate more efficiently if some flexibility
is provided to the Minority Health Commission authorizing broad powers under
this Section. Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate that the
General Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee as provided by this section.
The requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget
Committee is not a severable part of this section. If the requirement of
approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled
unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is
void.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 5. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 6. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
01/06/2025 3:27:13 PM MAH007

SB27
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 7. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.



















01/06/2025 3:27:13 PM MAH007